test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_ceve_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čeve: # ok
    čeve+N+Sg+Nom: čeve
    čeve+N+Sg+Gen: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Acc: čiäppát
    čeve+N+Sg+Ill: čiäpáttân
    čeve+N+Sg+Loc: čiäpáttist
    čeve+N+Sg+Com: čiäpáttáin
    čeve+N+Sg+Abe: čiäppáttáá
    čeve+N+Ess: [čevveen, čiäpáttin]
    čeve+N+Par: [čevveed, čiäpáttid]
    čeve+N+Pl+Nom: čiäpátteh
    čeve+N+Pl+Gen: čiäpáttij
    čeve+N+Pl+Acc: čiäpáttijd
    čeve+N+Pl+Ill: čiäpáttáid
    čeve+N+Pl+Loc: čiäpáttijn
    čeve+N+Pl+Com: [čiäpáttijguin, čiäpáttijgijn]
    čeve+N+Pl+Abe: čiäpáttijttáá
